Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1401.24
Manufacturer, defined.

(1) Manufacturer means any person, whether a resident or nonresident of this state, who is engaged in the business of distributing, manufacturing, or assembling a line-make of new motor vehicles, trailers, or motorcycles, and includes any such person who distributes such motor vehicles, trailers, or motorcycles directly or indirectly through one or more distributors to one or more new motor vehicle, trailer, or motorcycle dealers in this state.

(2) Manufacturer has the same meaning as the term franchisor.

(3) Manufacturer also includes a central or principal sales corporation or other entity through which, by contractual agreement or otherwise, a manufacturer distributes its products.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 36;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 55.